Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Article 1. State Use Tax
§ 39-16-107.
Compliance; collection procedures.

Returns, reports and preservation of records. The following shall apply:

Every vendor shall collect the tax imposed by this article and is liable for the entire amount of taxes imposed. The taxes are due and payable on the last day of the month following the month in which they were collected or as required by the department and each vendor shall on or before the last day of each month file a return showing the total sales of tangible personal property subject to the tax imposed by this article sold during the preceding month and remit all taxes due to the department. The returns shall contain such information required by the department. Any vendor shall report whether the vendor sells nicotine products, as defined by W.S. 39-18-101(a)(xiii), in this state to the department in the form and manner required by the department. The department may reject any report required under this paragraph of any vendor who does not comply with the nicotine sales reporting requirements. If the total tax to be remitted by a vendor is less than one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00) a quarterly or annual return as authorized by the department, and remittance in lieu of the monthly return may be made on or before the last day of the month following the end of the quarter or year for which the tax is collected. Returns shall be signed by the vendor or his agent;

Every person storing, using or consuming tangible personal property purchased from a vendor who does not maintain a place of business in this state is liable for the tax imposed by this article and shall on or before the last day of each month file a return showing the total sales price of tangible personal property purchased subject to the tax imposed by this article during the preceding month and remit all taxes due to the department. If the total tax to be remitted by the person during any month is less than one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00), a quarterly or annual return as authorized by the department, and remittance in lieu of the monthly return may be made on or before the last day of the month following the end of the quarter or year for which the tax is collected. The return shall contain such information as requested by the department. Returns shall be signed by the person liable for the tax or his agent;

The department may allow for extensions for filing returns, but no extension may be for more than ninety (90) days;

If the department believes any return and the taxes paid are incorrect it shall recompute the return and the tax based upon the best information available;

Taxes collected under paragraphs (b)(ii) and (iii) of this section shall be remitted in full by the county treasurer to the department monthly or as required by the department together with reports as required by the department;

Any out-of-state vendor not otherwise subject to this article may voluntarily register with the department and if registered, shall collect and remit the state use tax imposed by W.S. 39-16-104(a).

Payment. The following shall apply:

Except as otherwise provided, there is levied and shall be paid by the purchaser an excise tax at the same rate applied under W.S.

39-15-104

upon sales in Wyoming. The vendor shall collect the tax and give the purchaser a receipt therefor displaying the tax paid separately;

Except as provided by paragraph (iv) of this subsection, no vendor shall collect the taxes imposed by this article upon the sale of motor vehicles, house trailers, trailer coaches, trailers or semitrailers as defined by W.S.

31-1-101

. The taxes imposed shall be collected by the county treasurer prior to the first registration in Wyoming and not upon subsequent registration by the same owner. The county treasurer shall provide the applicant a receipt specifying the amount of use tax collected and noting any valid exemption from use tax. The county treasurer shall collect and remit to the department the tax in effect in the county of the owner’s principal residence. The tax shall not be collected if previously registered by the same nonresident owner in another state. The county treasurer may also collect the tax due and any interest, penalties or costs of collection through the use of a collection agency or by the filing of a civil action;

Except for those vehicles specified under paragraph (iv) of this subsection, the use tax imposed by this article upon a motor vehicle, house trailer, trailer coach, trailer or semitrailer purchased outside the state of Wyoming as a gift shall be collected from the donee prior to the first registration based upon the fair market value of the gift at the time of the gift;

Notwithstanding paragraph (ii) of this subsection, the tax imposed under this article upon the sale of mopeds and motorcycles as defined in W.S. 31-5-102(a) or off-road recreational vehicles defined by W.S.

31-1-101

(a)(xv) shall be collected by the vendor in the manner prescribed by W.S. 39-16-107(a);

If any vendor discontinues his business or sells his stock of goods he shall make a final return and payment within thirty (30) days thereafter. His successor in business shall withhold from the purchase price an amount equal to any taxes, penalty or interest due until the time the former owner produces a receipt from the department showing that all amounts due have been paid or a certificate that no taxes are due. If the successor fails to withhold from the purchase price the amount due he is liable for same;

No vendor shall advertise or state directly to the public that the taxes imposed by this article shall be assumed by the vendor or that it will not be added to the selling price or if added, will be refunded;

The department may provide for the issuance, affixing and payment of revenue stamps or the issuance of tokens or other devices to more efficiently secure the payment, collection and accounting for taxes imposed by this article;

If a vendor or direct payer pays taxes due and payable under this chapter on or before the fifteenth day of the month that the taxes are due under paragraph (a)(i) of this section, a credit shall be allowed against the taxes imposed by this chapter for expenses incurred by a vendor or direct payer for the accounting and reporting of taxes. For the first six thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($6,250.00) of tax due, the credit is equal to one and ninety-five hundredths percent (1.95%) of the amount of tax due. For any tax due in excess of six thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($6,250.00), the credit for that additional amount shall be one percent (1%) of that amount, provided that the total credit under this paragraph and W.S. 39-15-107(b)(xi) shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00) in any month. The vendor or direct payer shall deduct the credit for each tax period on forms prescribed and furnished by the department. The credit shall be deducted only from the share of the tax that is distributed to the general fund under W.S.

39-16-111

(b)(i);

The department may enter into contracts with collection agencies for required collection services on deficiencies of use tax occurring under W.S.

39-16-101

through

39-16-111

. Any taxes recovered by the collection agencies and remitted to the department shall be distributed in accordance with W.S. 39-16-111(b). Any person owing a tax submitted to a collection agency may be assessed a fee in an amount necessary to cover the cost of collection, not to exceed twenty percent (20%) of the tax owed, as provided in W.S. 9-1-415(a). The collection agency shall collect the fee with the tax that is submitted for collection and the amount collected as a fee may be deducted from funds remitted to the department. The contracts entered into under this paragraph shall not be for a term of more than two (2) years and shall be awarded only after competitive bidding.

Timelines. There are no specific applicable provisions for timelines for this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 1999, ch. 56, § 1; 2001, ch. 124, § 1; 2003, ch. 204, § 1; 2011, ch. 183, § 1; 2018 ch. 25, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2020 ch. 53, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2022 ch. 83, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2011 amendment,

effective January 1, 2012,
added (b)(viii).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added (b)(ix).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(i) substituted “vendor sells nicotine products, as defined by W.S. 39-18-101(a)(xiii)” for “vendor sells cigarettes, cigars, snuff or other tobacco products” and “nicotine sales” for “tobacco sales.”

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added the third sentence in (b)(ii).

No notice or hearing is necessary to make taxpayer liable for use taxes

since it is made taxpayer's duty to make return, accompanied by tax payment due. Morrison-Knudson Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 58 Wyo. 500, 135 P.2d 927,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 1943).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Federal retail luxury or other excise tax as includable in amount on which state use tax is computed, 43 ALR2d 862.

§ 39-16-108.
Enforcement.

Audits. To assess credits and deficiencies against taxpayers and vendors, the department is authorized to rely on final audit findings made by the department of audit, taxpayer information, vendor information or department review subject to the following conditions:

Audits shall commence when the taxpayer or vendor receives written notice of the engagement of the audit. The issuance of the written notice of the audit shall toll the statute of limitations provided in W.S.

39-16-110

for the audit period specified in this subsection. The audit shall be completed by the department of audit with final findings issued to the taxpayer or vendor within one (1) year of the date of the notice of engagement. This time limit may be extended only upon mutual agreement between the taxpayer or vendor and the department;

After receiving notice of an audit under this subsection, the taxpayer or vendor shall preserve all records and books necessary to determine the amount of tax due for the time period that is being audited;

Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, audits shall encompass a time period not to exceed three (3) years immediately preceding the reporting period when the audit is engaged. The three (3) year limit shall not apply to an audit if:

There is evidence of a violation of paragraph (c)(iv) of this section by the taxpayer or vendor for the reporting period being audited; or

There is evidence of gross negligence by the taxpayer or vendor in reporting or remitting taxes for the reporting period being audited.

If a taxpayer is not willing or able to produce adequate records to demonstrate taxes due, the department or the department of audit may project taxes based on the best information available. If a vendor is not willing or able to comply with the record requirements of W.S. 39-15-108(c)(xi), the department or the department of audit may project taxes based on the best information available;

Audits under this subsection are subject to the authority and procedures provided in W.S.

9-2-2003

.

Interest. The following shall apply:

Interest on amounts due under W.S.

39-16-107

shall be at one percent (1%) per month or fraction thereof from the date the return was due until paid. Effective July 1, 1994, interest at an annual rate equal to the average prime interest rate as determined by the state treasurer during the preceding fiscal year plus four percent (4%) shall be added to the delinquent tax. To determine the average prime interest rate, the state treasurer shall average the prime interest rate for at least seventy-five percent (75%) of the thirty (30) largest banks in the United States. The interest rate on delinquent taxes shall be adjusted on January 1 of each year following the year in which the taxes first became delinquent. In no instance shall the delinquent tax rate be greater than eighteen percent (18%) from any sale made on or after July 1, 1994. The interest rate on any delinquent tax from any sale made before July 1, 1994, shall be one percent (1%) per month from the date the return was due until paid;

The department may credit or waive interest imposed by this subsection as part of a settlement or for any other good cause.

Penalties. The following shall apply:

If any part of the deficiency is due to negligence or intentional disregard of this article or rules and regulations, a penalty of ten percent (10%) of the deficiency shall be added in addition to interest. If any part of the deficiency is due to fraud or an intent to evade this article or authorized rules and regulations, a penalty of twenty-five percent (25%) of the deficiency shall be added in addition to interest;

If any person liable for the tax imposed by this article neglects or fails to file a return the department shall make an estimate of the total taxable sales and taxes due from the best information available, adding a penalty of ten percent (10%) and interest as provided by paragraph (i) of this subsection from the date the taxes were due until paid. If the neglect or refusal is due to fraud or an intent to evade the provisions of this article a penalty of twenty-five percent (25%) shall be added in addition to interest;

If any person neglects or refuses to pay the tax imposed by this article the department shall compute the amount due based on the best information available, adding a penalty of ten percent (10%) and interest as provided by paragraph (i) of this subsection from the date the taxes were due until paid. Payment of the tax, penalty and interest imposed by this paragraph relieves the vendor from payment;

When the department has reason to believe the tax imposed by this article will be jeopardized by delay it shall immediately levy a jeopardy assessment which is immediately due and payable. If the jeopardy assessment is not paid within ten (10) days following notice thereof a delinquency penalty and interest as imposed by paragraph (ii) of this subsection shall be added;

If the taxes, penalty and interest due under this section are unpaid within ten (10) days following service of notice an additional penalty of ten percent (10%) and interest as provided by paragraph (i) of this subsection shall be added by the department;

The department shall promptly give written notice of all taxes, penalty and interest due under this section by personal service or mail to the address as shown in the department records;

The department may bring an action to recover any delinquent taxes, penalty or interest in any appropriate court within three (3) years following the delinquency. In the case of an assessment created by an audit, the delinquency period is deemed to start thirty (30) days after the date the assessment letter is sent. Any Tax penalty and interest related to the audit assessment shall be calculated from the filing period during which the deficiency occurred. In such action a certificate by the department is prima facie evidence of the amount due;

Any person who violates W.S. 39-16-107(b)(i) or (vi) is guilty of a misdemeanor;

Any person who violates W.S. 39-16-102(c) is guilty of a misdemeanor;

Any person who fails to file any return required by this article, refuses to provide any information requested by the department or violates any other provision of this article for which there is no specific penalty is guilty of a misdemeanor;

Any person who violates W.S. 39-16-106(a) is guilty of a misdemeanor;

Any person who files a false or fraudulent return is subject to the provisions of W.S.

6-5-303

;

Upon request of the department, the attorney general may institute proceedings to restrain and enjoin any person from:

Acting as a vendor until they have received a license as required by W.S.

39-15-106

;

Continuing to act as a vendor if they have not remitted to the department, when due, all taxes, penalty and interest imposed by this article.

W.S. 39-15-108(b)(ii), (c)(iv) and 39-15-107(b)(iv) apply to use taxes under this article;

The department may impose a penalty of ten dollars ($10.00) upon any vendor who fails to file his return in a timely manner as required by W.S. 39-16-107(a) provided the vendor files his return within thirty (30) days of receiving notice from the department pursuant to paragraph (xii) of this subsection. The department may impose a penalty of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) upon any vendor who fails to file his return within thirty (30) days of receiving notice from the department pursuant to paragraph (xii) of this subsection;

The department, for good cause, may waive a penalty imposed for failure to file a return provided that the taxpayer requests the waiver in writing within ninety (90) days after the due date, setting forth the reasons for the late filing;

The department may credit or waive penalties imposed by this subsection as part of a settlement or for any other good cause;

Notwithstanding W.S. 39-16-102(c), if any vendor or taxpayer is one hundred fifty (150) days or more delinquent on taxes due under this article, has not entered into a formal payment arrangement with the department and after thirty (30) days notice provided by first class mail, the department shall post monthly the name of the vendor or taxpayer, the sales and use tax license number, physical address and the unpaid balance owed by the vendor or taxpayer on the website of the department indicating that the vendor or taxpayer has not paid the tax due under this article.

Liens. The following shall apply:

Any tax due under this article constitutes a debt to the state from the persons who are parties to the transaction and is a lien from the date due on all the property of those persons. The tax lien shall have preference over all liens except any valid mortgage or other liens of record filed or recorded prior to the date the tax became due. When the tax is collected by a retailer or his agent, the tax lien has the same status as sales tax liens under W.S. 39-15-108(d)(i);

If any person is delinquent in the payment of taxes, penalty or interest imposed by this article, the department may give notice of the amount of the delinquency to any person having in their possession or control credits or personal property belonging to the delinquent taxpayer or owing debts to him at the time of the notice. No person so notified shall transfer or make any disposition of the credits, personal property or debts unless the department approves of the disposition or until sixty (60) days has elapsed from the receipt of the notice. Each person receiving a notice under this paragraph shall advise the department within five (5) days after receiving the notice of all credits or personal property in their possession or under their control which belong to the delinquent taxpayer or of debts owed him;

Upon a failure to pay the tax due upon any vehicle as provided by this section, the county treasurer shall notify the department which may file a lien against the vehicle as provided by this subsection and shall note the lien on the title of the vehicle.

Tax sales. At any time following a delinquency the department with board approval may seize and sell at public auction any property owned by the delinquent taxpayer to pay all taxes, penalty and interest due plus the cost involved in seizing and selling the property. Notice of the sale showing its time and place shall be mailed to the delinquent taxpayer at least ten (10) days prior to the sale. The notice shall also be printed in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county wherein the seized property is to be sold at least ten (10) days prior to the sale. If no newspaper is published in the county the notice shall be posted in three (3) public places ten (10) days prior to the sale. The notice shall contain a description of the property to be sold, a statement of the entire amount due, the name of the delinquent taxpayer and a statement that unless the amount due is paid on or before the time of sale, the property or so much thereof as necessary shall be sold. The department, with board approval, shall give the purchaser a bill of sale for personal property or a deed for real property purchased at the sale. Any unsold property seized may be left at the sale at the risk of the delinquent taxpayer. If the monies received at the sale are in excess of the amount due the excess shall be given to the delinquent taxpayer upon his receipt therefor. If a receipt by the delinquent taxpayer is not given the department shall deposit the excess with the state treasurer as trustee for the delinquent taxpayer.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 1999, ch. 58, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 48, § 3; 2015 ch. 140, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2018 ch. 53, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

Editor's notes. —

There is no paragraph (a)(ii) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, added
(c)(xviii).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, deleted former introductory text of (a), which read: “Audits. The following shall apply” and added current text of (a); deleted former (a)(i), which read: “If the department believes any return and the taxes paid are incorrect it shall recompute the return and the tax based upon the best information available” and added (a)(i); and added (a)(ii) through (a)(v).

Business's erroneous collection of taxes from customers not subject to judicial review. —

A business erroneously collected sales tax from its customers and remitted the same to the state, and was assessed sales and use tax on materials consumed by it as a contractor. No payment was made on the assessment, but, instead, a hearing was held by the board on the business's contention that it was entitled to a credit for the sales tax it collected, with a subsequent appeal to the district court. The court was without subject matter jurisdiction for the following reasons: (1) the aggrieved party was statutorily required to pay all taxes prior to appealing the decision; and (2) the money collected from the customers belonged to third parties and could not qualify as payment of the business's taxes. M & B Drilling & Constr. Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 706 P.2d 243,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 560

(Wyo. 1985).

Applied

in

United Pac. Ins. Co. v. Wyoming Excise Tax Div., 713 P.2d 217,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 456

(Wyo. 1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Failure to pay to government sales or use tax funds as constituting larceny or embezzlement, 8 ALR4th 1068.

§ 39-16-109.
Taxpayer remedies.

Interpretation requests. There are no specific applicable provisions for interpretation requests for this article.

Appeals. Except as provided by this subsection, no person who feels aggrieved by the payment of the taxes, penalty and interest imposed by this article may appeal a decision of the board until all taxes, penalty and interest have been paid. For good cause shown, the court to which the decision of the board is appealed may stay enforcement of the board’s order assessing and levying the tax during the pendency of the appeal. The court’s stay of enforcement shall not affect the accruing of interest upon any assessment and levy.

Refunds. The following shall apply:

Any tax, penalty or interest which has been erroneously paid, computed or remitted to the department by a vendor shall on department approval be credited against any subsequent tax liability from the payee or may be refunded. If a vendor erroneously collects taxes from a taxpayer and remits those taxes to the department, the vendor may seek a refund or credit against subsequent tax liability only after the vendor has refunded the erroneously collected tax to the taxpayer that originally paid the tax to the vendor. If the taxpayer that originally paid the tax to the vendor cannot be identified, the tax shall not be refunded or credited to the vendor. No credit or refund shall be allowed after three (3) years from the date of overpayment. The receipt of a claim for a refund by the department shall toll the statute of limitations. All refund requests received by the department shall be approved or denied within ninety (90) days of receipt. Any refund or credit erroneously made or allowed may be recovered in an action brought by the attorney general in a court of competent jurisdiction in Laramie county, Wyoming.

Credits. The following shall apply:

Any tax, penalty or interest which has been erroneously paid, computed or remitted to the department by a vendor shall on department approval be credited against any subsequent liability from the payee or may be refunded. If a vendor erroneously collects taxes from a taxpayer and remits those taxes to the department, the vendor may seek a credit against subsequent tax liability or a refund only after the vendor has refunded the erroneously collected tax to the taxpayer that originally paid the tax to the vendor. If the taxpayer that originally paid the tax to the vendor cannot be identified, the tax shall not be credited or refunded to the vendor. Any refund or credit erroneously made or allowed may be recovered in an action brought by the attorney general in a court of competent jurisdiction in Laramie county, Wyoming;

The taxpayer or vendor is entitled to receive an offsetting credit for any overpaid excise tax identified by an audit that is within the scope of the audit period, without regard to the limitation period for requesting refunds. This paragraph shall not apply to any tax which was erroneously collected from a taxpayer and remitted by a vendor unless the auditor can determine that the erroneously collected taxes have been refunded to the taxpayer that originally paid the tax to the vendor;

The department shall allow a credit for sales tax legally imposed and paid to another state on a purchase equal to but not exceeding the liability for use tax under this article on that purchase. The department may require that any claim for a credit be substantiated in writing showing the sales tax paid.

Redemption. There are no specific applicable provisions for redemption for this article.

Escrow. There are no specific applicable provisions for escrow for this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 1999, ch. 58, § 2; 2016 ch. 33, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, in (c)(i) and (d)(i), substituted “paid, computed or remitted to the department by a vendor” for “paid, collected or computed” and added the second sentence; and in (d)(ii), inserted “or vendor” following “The taxpayer” and added the second sentence.

Editor's notes. —

There is no paragraph (c)(ii) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Interest on tax refund or credit in absence of specific controlling statute, 88 ALR2d 823.

§ 39-16-110.
Statute of limitations.

Every vendor and person storing, using or consuming tangible personal property in this state shall preserve within this state for three (3) years suitable records and books as may be necessary to determine the amount of tax for which he is liable under the provisions of this article, together with invoices and books showing all merchandise purchased. All records, books and invoices shall be available for examination by the department during regular business hours except as arranged by mutual consent.

No credit or refund shall be allowed after three (3) years from the date of overpayment. The receipt of a claim for a refund by the department shall toll the statute of limitations. All refund requests received by the department shall be approved or denied within ninety (90) days of receipt.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.